Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Board of Directors

271B.8-010.
Requirement for and duties of board of directors.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each corporation shall have a board of directors.

All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the corporation managed under the direction of, its board of directors, subject to any limitation set forth in the articles of incorporation.

A corporation having fifty (50) or fewer shareholders may dispense with or limit the authority of a board of directors by describing in its articles of incorporation who will perform some or all of the duties of a board of directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 68, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-020.
Qualifications of directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for directors. A director shall not be required to be a resident of this state or a shareholder of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws so prescribe.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 69, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-030.
Number and election of directors.

A board of directors shall consist of one (1) or more individuals, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

If a board of directors has power to fix or change the number of directors, the board may increase or decrease by thirty percent (30%) or less the number of directors last approved by the shareholders, but only the shareholders may increase or decrease by more than thirty percent (30%) the number of directors last approved by the shareholders.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may establish a variable range for the size of the board of directors by fixing a minimum and maximum number of directors. If a variable range is established, the number of directors may be fixed or changed from time to time, within the minimum and maximum, by the shareholders or the board of directors. After shares are issued, only the shareholders may change the range for the size of the board or change from a fixed to a variable-range size board or vice versa.

Directors shall be elected at the first annual shareholders’ meeting and at each annual meeting thereafter unless their terms are staggered under KRS

271B.8-060

.

Every director of a corporation, by acceptance of election or appointment as a director, including by service, shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any action by, in the name of, or on behalf of the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 70, effective January 1, 1989; 2012, ch. 81, § 89, effective July 12, 2012.

271B.8-040.
Election of directors by certain classes of shareholders.

If the articles of incorporation authorize dividing the shares into classes, the articles may also authorize the election of all or a specified number of directors by the holders of one (1) or more authorized classes of shares. A class (or classes) of shares entitled to elect one (1) or more directors is a separate voting group for purposes of the election of directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 71, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-050.
Terms of directors generally.

The terms of the initial directors of a corporation shall expire at the first shareholders’ meeting at which directors are elected.

The terms of all other directors shall expire at the next annual shareholders’ meeting following their election unless their terms are staggered under KRS

271B.8-060

.

A decrease in the number of directors shall not shorten an incumbent director’s term.

For a corporation the directors of which are divided into groups under KRS

271B.8-060

, any director filling a vacancy under KRS

271B.8-100

shall hold office until the next election of the group in which the director is filling the vacancy, and until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified.

Despite the expiration of a director’s term, he shall continue to serve until his successor is elected and qualifies or until there is a decrease in the number of directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 72, effective January 1, 1989; 2001, ch. 130, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

271B.8-060.
Staggered terms for directors.

The articles of incorporation may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors in two (2) or three (3) groups, with each group containing one-half (1/2) or one-third (1/3) of the total, as near as may be. In that event, the terms of directors in the first group shall expire at the first annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, the terms of the second group shall expire at the second annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, and the terms of the third group, if any, shall expire at the third annual shareholders’ meeting after their election. At each annual shareholders’ meeting held thereafter, directors shall be chosen for a term of two (2) years or three (3) years, as the case may be, to succeed those whose terms expire.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 73, effective January 1, 1989; 1996, ch. 21, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

271B.8-070.
Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the board of directors, its chairman, or to the corporation.

A resignation shall be effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 74, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-080.
Removal of directors by shareholders.

The shareholders may remove one (1) or more directors with or without cause, unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

If a director is elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting group may participate in the vote to remove him or her.

If cumulative voting is authorized, a director shall not be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect him or her under cumulative voting is voted against his or her removal. If cumulative voting is not authorized, a director shall be removed only if the number of votes cast to remove him or her exceeds the number of votes cast not to remove him or her.

A director shall be removed by the shareholders only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing him or her, and the meeting notice shall state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 75, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 19, effective November 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137, sec. 179, effective June 26, 2007 provided: The General Assembly finds and declares that the amendment of KRS

271B.6-210

,

271B.6-230

,

271B.7-040

,

271B.7-280

, and

271B.8-080

, as provided for in 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 102, secs. 10, 11, 15, 18, and 19, respectively, are and were effective as of November 15, 2002.

(11/15/2002). 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 102, sec. 22, provides that this section “shall take effect November 15, 2002, if a constitutional amendment proposing to amend Sections 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 195, 198, 200, 202, 203, 205, 207 and 208 of the Constitution of Kentucky relating to corporations is enacted by the General Assembly and approved by the voters in the November, 2002 general election.” Otherwise, [this section] shall be void.

A constitutional amendment proposing to amend 11 of those 13 sections of the Constitution was enacted by the General Assembly and approved by the voters. During the 2002 Regular Session, the General Assembly enacted 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 341, which proposed to amend Sections 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 198, 200, 202, 203, 207, and 208 of the Constitution of Kentucky. The voters approved that amendment in the November, 2002 general elections.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Young, Modernizing Kentucky’s Corporate Laws, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

271B.8-100.
Vacancy on board.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, if a vacancy occurs on a board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors:

The shareholders may fill the vacancy;

The board of directors may fill the vacancy; or

If the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors remaining in office.

If the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the holders of shares of that voting group shall be entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the shareholders.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date (by reason of a resignation effective at a later date under subsection (2) of KRS

271B.8-070

or otherwise) may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 76, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-110.
Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 77, effective January 1, 1989.